Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3803
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Agricultural Products Marketing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 2-3804 to 2-3807 shall be used.

Laws 1979, LB 538, § 3;

Laws 1988, LB 807, § 3.